Mississippi, session 20251E, SB2011.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the operation and support of the public community and junior colleges for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026.......................... ............................................ $ 227,653,510.00. SECTION 2.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the special funds specified herein to the Mississippi Community College Board for the operation and support of the public community and junior colleges for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026........................................ ............................................. $   65,785,786.00. SECTION 3.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2 of this act, Sixty-four Million Seven Hundred Eighty-five Thousand Seven Hundred Eighty-six Dollars ($64,785,786.00) shall be derived from funds in the Education Enhancement Fund deposited pursuant to Sections 27-65-75 and 27-67-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, not otherwise appropriated, for the operation and support of public community and junior colleges. SECTION 4.  The funds provided in this section shall be allocated for the aid and support of the public and community junior colleges through the community college support funding formula and shall be apportioned in accordance with the following assigned weights: FTE Formula Section              Formula (a)  Aid to Colleges: Base                    15% prior year appropriation Academic                1.0 Technical               1.0 (b)  Career                       1.0 (c)  Associate Degree Nursing                      1.19 (d)  Associate Degree Allied Health                1.19 Academic, Technical, Career, Associate Degree Nursing and Associate Degree Allied Health funds shall be disbursed on the basis of prior year full-time equivalency (FTE) of hours generated during the summer, fall and spring semesters for each public community and junior college student actually enrolled and in attendance the last day of the sixth week of each semester, or its equivalent, counting only students who reside within the State of Mississippi.  However, associate degree nursing students who reside outside the State of Mississippi may be counted for pay purposes. The Director of the Mississippi Community College Board, or his designee, shall audit each public community and junior college and shall determine who shall be counted in each college and shall certify the number to the Mississippi Community College Board. If, pending determination of the enrollment of students at the public community and junior colleges entitled to participate in this appropriation, as provided for in this section, the Mississippi Community College Board shall find and determine that any such public or community junior college does not have sufficient funds on hand for payment of the necessary expenses of its operation for the period commencing July 1, 2025, until distribution of the funds appropriated hereby, then, in that event, the Mississippi Community College Board is expressly authorized to make an advance to any such public community or junior college or colleges not having sufficient operating funds for such period from the funds appropriated hereby; provided, however, that the amount of any such advance to any one (1) public community or junior college shall not exceed thirty-three percent (33%) of the amount of state-appropriated funds received by such public community or junior college during the preceding fiscal year; and provided, further, that the amount of any such advance shall be deducted from the pro rata part of the funds appropriated hereby accruing to said public community or junior college when enrollment has been ascertained and distribution of funds is made. (a)  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, an amount not to exceed One Hundred Seventy-seven Million Two Hundred Fifty-nine Thousand Two Hundred Twelve Dollars ($177,259,212.00) is authorized for the aid and support of the public community colleges to be distributed through the community college support funding formula. (b)  Of the funds provided in Section 3 of this act, Fifty-one Million Eight Hundred Eighty-four Thousand Nine Hundred Forty-six Dollars ($51,884,946.00), or so much as may be necessary, shall be derived out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Education Enhancement Fund and deposited pursuant to Sections 27-65-75 and 27-67-31, Mississippi Code of 1972.  These funds are authorized for the aid and support of the public community colleges to be distributed through the community college support funding formula. SECTION 5.  The following public community and junior colleges which qualify shall participate in the funds provided herein: Coahoma Community College, Copiah-Lincoln Community College, East Central Community College, East Mississippi Community College, Hinds Community College, Holmes Community College, Itawamba Community College, Jones County Junior College, Meridian Community College, Mississippi Delta Community College, Mississippi Gulf Coast Community College, Northeast Mississippi Community College, Northwest Mississippi Community College, Pearl River Community College, and Southwest Mississippi Community College. SECTION 6.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, an amount not to exceed Thirty Million Eight Hundred Nine Thousand One Hundred Sixty-six Dollars ($30,809,166.00) is authorized for the aid of the public community and junior colleges to fund life and health insurance for all employees of the public community and junior colleges. The funds allocated in this section shall only be used to participate in the State and School Employees' Life and Health Insurance Plan and any funds appropriated in this section for this purpose, which are not expended during the fiscal year shall be carried forward for the same purposes during the next succeeding fiscal year. SECTION 7.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2 of this act, One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) shall be derived out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Insurance Carryover Fund No. 3295, for the purpose of fully funding life and health insurance through the State and School Employees' Life and Health Insurance Plan for all qualified community and junior college employees. SECTION 8.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, an amount not to exceed Six Million Seven Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($6,750,000.00) shall be used for the purpose of Workforce and Economic Development Support, including the operation of the Workforce Development Centers and Advanced Training Centers, providing start-up costs for new career and technical programs, and providing the necessary funding to replace outdated and obsolete equipment for existing career and technical programs at each of the public community and junior colleges. SECTION 9.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, One Hundred Seventy-nine Thousand Fifty Dollars ($179,050.00) shall be used for the purpose of defraying the cost of Sign Language Interpreter Training at the public community and junior colleges. SECTION 10.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 and provided in Section 2 of this act, Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) shall be used by the Mississippi Community College Board for the purpose of defraying the cost of the Education Technology Program at the public community and junior colleges and the Mississippi Community College Board.  Seven Million Ninety-nine Thousand One Hundred Sixty Dollars ($7,099,160.00) shall be derived from Section 1 of this act, and Two Million Nine Hundred Thousand Eight Hundred Forty Dollars ($2,900,840.00) shall be derived from Section 3 of this act out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Education Enhancement Fund and deposited pursuant to Sections 27-65-75 and 27-67-31, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 11.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, Two Million Five Hundred Fifty-six Thousand Nine Hundred Twenty-two Dollars ($2,556,922.00) shall be used for the purpose of defraying the cost of the Associate Degree Nursing and Allied Health Programs. SECTION 12.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) shall be used for the purpose of continuing the dropout recovery initiative based on a successful program administered through the adult basic education program with the Mississippi Community College Board.  These funds shall also be used for the purpose of enrolling low-skill adults in career pathways that combine high school equivalency, skills training and workforce credentials in an intensive program that produces adults who can compete for jobs. Of the funds provided in this section, one-half (1/2) shall be allocated equally and the remaining one-half (1/2) shall be allocated on the basis of the prior year headcount enrollment in Adult Education, MIBEST or other career pathway programs. The public community and junior colleges shall prepare and make available to the Legislature and the Legislative Budget Office a comprehensive report on the number of dropouts that have enrolled in a High School Equivalency and/or career program for each community and junior college during Fiscal Year 2025 on, or before, August 1, 2026. SECTION 13.  Of the funds provided in Section 3 of this act, Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00), or so much thereof as may be necessary, shall be derived out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Education Enhancement Fund and deposited pursuant to Sections 27-65-75 and 27-67-31, Mississippi Code of 1972.  These funds shall be used for the Career and Technical Advantage Program which will provide start-up costs for new career and technical programs, expansion of existing career and technical programs, and infrastructure for career and technical program equipment, lab upgrades, and renovations to sustain the programs at public community colleges. Fifteen percent (15%) of the funds appropriated in this section shall be distributed evenly to each community college.  The remaining eighty-five percent (85%) of the funds shall be distributed on the basis of prior year career and technical full-time equivalency (FTE) hours generated during the summer, fall, and spring semesters for each public community college. SECTION 14.  In compliance with the "Mississippi Performance Budget and Strategic Planning Act of 1994," it is the intent of the Legislature that the funds provided herein shall be utilized in the most efficient and effective manner possible to achieve the intended mission of this agency.  Based on the funding authorized, this agency shall make every effort to attain the targeted performance measures provided below: FY2026 Performance Measures                                       Target Instruction Number of Total Degrees Awarded per 100 FTE Enrollment                                    34.40 Number of Associate Degrees Awarded per 100 FTE Enrollment                                17.92 Number of Associate of Applied Science Degrees Awarded per 100 FTE Enrollment             10.62 Number of Certificates Awarded per 100 FTE Enrollment                                    14.59 Percent of First-Time Entering, Part-Time Degree- Seeking Students (Fall) who Earned 24 Credit Hours by the End of Year Two                                   17.81 Percent of First-Time Entering, Full-Time Degree-Seeking Students (Fall) who Earned 42 Credit Hours by the End of Year Two                                       49.09 Percent of Associate Degree Nursing and Practical Nursing Licensure Exam Pass Rates                                            94.44 Percent of Total Student Success, Which Includes Graduates, Transfers, and Retention (Those Still Enrolled)                  69.28 Percent of Graduates                                   38.68 Percent of Transfers                                   19.31 Percent of Retention                                    8.56 Percent of Students Enrolled in Career/ Technical and Health Science Graduates             23.50 Percent of In-State Job Placements of Career/ Technical and Health Science Graduates                                         90.86 Number of High School Equivalencies Awarded             3,836 A reporting of the degree to which the performance targets set above have been or are being achieved shall be provided in the agency's budget request submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee for Fiscal Year 2027. SECTION 15.  It is the intention of the Legislature that none of the General Funds appropriated herein shall be expended for the purpose of paying salaries, wages, and fringe benefits of any public community and junior college employee who is serving as a member of the State of Mississippi Legislature. SECTION 16.  A Mississippi Prepaid Affordable College Tuition (MPACT) program beneficiary shall be considered a Mississippi resident for the purposes of participating in this appropriation regardless of the beneficiary's residence on the date of enrollment, as set out in Section 37-155-5(d)(iii), Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 17.  It is the intention of the Legislature that none of the funds provided herein shall be used to pay certain utilities for state-furnished housing for any employees.  Such utilities shall include electricity, natural gas, butane, propane, cable and phone services. Where actual cost cannot be determined, the agency shall be required to provide meters to be in compliance with legislative intent.  Such state-furnished housing shall include single-family and multifamily residences but shall not include any dormitory residences.  Allowances for such utilities shall be prohibited. SECTION 18.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 19.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the support of the community and junior colleges shall maintain complete accounting and personnel records related to the expenditure of all funds appropriated under this act and that such records shall be in the same format and level of detail as maintained for Fiscal Year 2025.  It is further the intention of the Legislature that the agency's budget request for Fiscal Year 2027 shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in a format and level of detail comparable to the format and level of detail provided during the Fiscal Year 2026 budget request process. SECTION 20.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the funds herein appropriated shall be expended in compliance with Section 27-104-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, that no state agency shall incur obligations or indebtedness in excess of their appropriation and that the responsible officers, either personally or upon their official bonds, shall be held responsible for actions contrary to this provision. SECTION 21.  The funds disbursed under the provisions of this act shall be accounted for through the Mississippi Community College Board.  No part of the amount herein appropriated shall be used by the Mississippi Community College Board for administrative or other purposes except in the manner and to the extent authorized in this act making an appropriation for the expenses of the Mississippi Community College Board. SECTION 22.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law. SECTION 23.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2025.